Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
123

NAVAL
MILITIA

Section

123-1 Organization

123-2 Divisions; formation of

123-3 Commander in chief; powers of

123-4 Officers; appointment; term

123-5 Enlisted personnel; term of service

123-6 Vessels; instructors

123-7 Battalions and divisions

123-8 Pay

Cross References

Civil relief for
state military forces, see chapter 657D.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next